New York, session 2025-2026, A1777.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 265.10 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 481 of the laws of 2024, is amended and a new subdi- 3 vision 10 is added to read as follows: 4 1. Any person who manufactures or causes to be manufactured any 5 machine-gun, assault weapon, large capacity ammunition feeding device, 6 ghost gun, unfinished frame or receiver, firearm silencer, magazine, or 7 major component of a firearm, rifle or shotgun or disguised gun is guil- 8 ty of a class D felony. Any person who manufactures or causes to be 9 manufactured any rapid-fire modification device is guilty of a class E 10 felony. Any person who manufactures or causes to be manufactured any 11 switchblade knife, pilum ballistic knife, metal knuckle knife, undetect- 12 able knife, billy, blackjack, bludgeon, plastic knuckles, metal knuck- 13 les, throwing star, chuka stick, sandbag, sandclub or slungshot is guil- 14 ty of a class A misdemeanor. 15 10. Any person who intentionally sells, distributes, or disposes of, 16 by any means, including via the internet, digital instructions in the 17 form of computer-aided design files, standard triangle/tessellation 18 language files, or other code or instructions that may be used to 19 program a three-dimensional printer to manufacture or produce any 20 machine-gun, assault weapon, large capacity ammunition feeding device, 21 disguised gun, ghost gun, unfinished frame or receiver, firearm silenc- 22 er, magazine, rapid-fire modification device or major component of a 23 firearm, rifle or shotgun, to a person in New York who is not registered EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00770-02-5 A. 1777--A 2 1 or licensed as a gunsmith as provided for in section 400.00 of this 2 chapter with a Type 7 Federal Firearms License, is guilty of a class A 3 misdemeanor. 4 § 2. Section 265.00 of the penal law is amended by adding a new subdi- 5 vision 37 to read as follows: 6 37. "Three-dimensional printer" means a computer or computer-driven 7 machine or device capable of producing a three-dimensional object from a 8 digital model. 9 § 3. Subdivision 8 of section 700.05 of the criminal procedure law is 10 amended by adding a new paragraph (w) to read as follows: 11 (w) Manufacture, transport, disposition and defacement of weapons and 12 dangerous instruments and appliances as provided in subdivision ten of 13 section 265.10 of the penal law. 14 § 4. Severability. If any provision of this act, or any application of 15 any provision of this act, is held to be invalid, that shall not affect 16 the validity or effectiveness of any other provision of this act, or of 17 any other application of any provision of this act, which can be given 18 effect without that provision or application; and to that end, the 19 provisions and applications of this act are severable. 20 § 5. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 21 have become a law.